Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 178.300 is amended to read:
178.300. As used in ORS 178.300 to 178.355:
(1) “Account” means an individual account  established in accordance with ORS 178.300 to
178.355.
(2) “Account owner”  means the person who has the right to withdraw funds from the account.
The account owner may also be the designated beneficiary of the account.
(3) “Board” means the Oregon 529 Savings Board established under ORS 178.310.
(4) “Designated  beneficiary” means, except as provided in ORS 178.350, the individual designated
at the time the account is opened as having the right to receive a  qualified withdrawal for the
payment of qualified higher  education expenses, or if the designated beneficiary is replaced in ac-
cordance with ORS 178.350, the replacement.
(5) “Financial institution” means a bank, a  commercial bank, a national bank, a savings bank,
a savings and loan, a thrift institution, a credit union, an insurance company, a trust company, a
mutual fund, an investment firm or other similar entity authorized to do business in this state.
(6) “Higher education  institution” means an eligible education institution as defined in section
529(e)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(7) “Internal Revenue Code” means the federal  Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect
on December 31, [ 2016] 2017.
(8) “Member of the family” shall  have the same meaning as contained in section 529(e) of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(9) “Network” means the Oregon 529 Savings Network established under ORS 178.305.
(10) “Nonqualified withdrawal” means a withdrawal from an account that  is not a qualified
withdrawal.
(11) “Qualified higher education expenses” means tuition and  other permitted expenses as set
forth in section 529(e) of the Internal Revenue Code for the enrollment or attendance of a designated
beneficiary at a higher education institution.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 1
(12) “Qualified withdrawal” means a withdrawal made  as prescribed under ORS 178.355 and
made:
(a) From an account to pay the qualified higher education expenses of the designated benefici-
ary;
(b) As the result of the death or disability of the designated beneficiary;
(c) As the result of a scholarship, allowance  or payment described in section 135(d)(1)(A), (B)
or (C) of the Internal Revenue Code that is  received by the designated beneficiary, but only to the
extent of the amount of the scholarship, allowance or payment; or
(d) As a rollover or change in the designated beneficiary described in ORS 178.350.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 238A.005 is amended to read:
238A.005. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Active member” means a member of the pension program  or the individual account program
of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan who is actively employed in a qualifying position.
(2) “Actuarial equivalent” means a payment  or series of payments having the same value as the
payment or series of payments replaced, computed  on the basis of interest rate and mortality as-
sumptions adopted by the board.
(3) “Board” means the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(4) “Eligible employee” means a person who performs services for  a participating public em-
ployer, including elected officials other than judges. “Eligible employee” does not include:
(a) Persons engaged as independent contractors;
(b) Aliens working under a training or educational visa;
(c) Persons provided sheltered employment or make-work by a public employer;
(d) Persons categorized by a participating public employer as student employees;
(e) Any person who is an inmate of a state institution;
(f) Employees of foreign trade offices  of the Oregon Business Development Department who live
and perform services in foreign countries under the provisions of ORS 285A.075 (1)(g);
(g) An  employee actively participating in an alternative retirement program established under
ORS 353.250 or an optional retirement plan established under ORS 341.551;
(h) Employees of a public university listed in ORS  352.002 who are actively participating in an
optional retirement plan offered under ORS 243.800;
(i) Persons employed in positions classified  as post-doctoral scholar positions by a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or by the Oregon Health and Science University, under ORS 350.370;
(j) Any employee who belongs to a class of employees that was not eligible on August  28, 2003,
for membership in the system under the provisions of ORS chapter 238 or other law;
(k) Any person who belongs  to a class of employees who are not eligible to become members
of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan under the provisions of ORS 238A.070 (2);
(L) Any person who is retired under ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250 or  ORS chapter 238 and who
continues to receive retirement benefits while employed; and
(m) Judges.
(5) “Firefighter” means:
(a) A person  employed by a local government, as defined in ORS 174.116, whose primary job
duties include the fighting of fires;
(b) The State  Fire Marshal, the chief deputy state fire marshal and deputy state fire marshals;
and
(c) An employee of the State Forestry Department who is certified  by the State Forester as a
professional wildland firefighter and whose primary  duties include the abatement of uncontrolled
fires as described in ORS 477.064.
(6) “Fund” means the Public Employees Retirement Fund.
(7)(a) “Hour of service” means:
(A) An hour for which an eligible employee is directly or indirectly  paid or entitled to payment
by a participating public employer for performance of duties in a qualifying position; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 2
(B) An hour of vacation, holiday, illness, incapacity, jury duty, military duty or authorized  leave
during which an employee does not perform duties but for which the  employee is directly or indi-
rectly paid or entitled to payment  by a participating public employer for services in a qualifying
position, as long as the hour is within  the number of hours regularly scheduled for the performance
of duties during the period of vacation, holiday, illness, incapacity,  jury duty, military duty or au-
thorized leave.
(b) “Hour of service”  does not include any hour for which payment is made or due under a plan
maintained solely for the purpose of complying with applicable unemployment compensation laws.
(8) “Inactive member” means a member  of the pension program or the individual account pro-
gram of  the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan whose membership has not been terminated, who
is not a retired member and who is not employed in a qualifying position.
(9) “Individual account  program” means the defined contribution individual account program of
the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan established under ORS 238A.025.
(10) “Institution of higher education” means a public university listed  in ORS 352.002, the
Oregon Health and Science University or a community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
(11) “Member” means  an eligible employee who has established membership in the pension pro-
gram or the individual account  program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan and whose
membership has not been terminated under ORS 238A.110 or 238A.310.
(12) “Participating public employer” means a public employer as defined in ORS 238.005 that
provides retirement benefits for employees of the public employer under the system.
(13) “Pension program” means the defined benefit pension program of the Oregon  Public Service
Retirement Plan established under ORS 238A.025.
(14) “Police officer” means a police officer as described in ORS 238.005.
(15) “Qualifying position” means one or more jobs with one or more participating public  em-
ployers in which an eligible employee performs 600 or more hours of service in a  calendar year,
excluding any service in a job for which benefits are not provided under  the Oregon Public Service
Retirement Plan pursuant to ORS 238A.070 (2).
(16) “Retired member” means a pension program member who is receiving  a pension as provided
in ORS 238A.180 to 238A.195.
(17)(a) “Salary” means the remuneration paid to an active member in return for services to the
participating public employer, including remuneration in the form of living quarters,  board or other
items of value, to the extent the remuneration is  includable in the employee’s taxable income under
Oregon law. “Salary” includes the additional amounts specified in paragraph  (b) of this subsection,
but does not include the amounts specified in paragraph (c) of this  subsection, regardless of whether
those amounts are includable in taxable income.
(b) “Salary” includes the following amounts:
(A) Payments of employee and employer money into a deferred compensation  plan that are made
at the election of the employee.
(B) Contributions to a tax-sheltered or deferred annuity that are made at the election of the
employee.
(C) Any amount that is contributed to a cafeteria  plan or qualified transportation fringe benefit
plan by the employer at the election of the employee  and that is not includable in the taxable in-
come of the employee by  reason of 26 U.S.C. 125 or 132(f)(4), as in effect on  December 31, [ 2016]
2017.
(D) Any amount  that is contributed to a cash or deferred arrangement by the employer at the
election of the employee and  that is not included in the taxable income of the employee by reason
of 26 U.S.C. 402(e)(3), as in effect on December 31, [ 2016] 2017.
(E) Retroactive payments described in ORS 238.008.
(F) The amount of an employee contribution to the individual account program that is paid by
the employer and deducted from the compensation of the employee, as provided  under ORS 238A.335
(1) and (2)(a).
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 3
(G) The amount of an employee contribution to the individual account program that is  not paid
by the employer under ORS 238A.335.
(H) Wages of  a deceased member paid to a surviving spouse or dependent children under ORS
652.190.
(c) “Salary” does not include the following amounts:
(A) Travel or any  other expenses incidental to employer’s business which is reimbursed by the
employer.
(B) Payments made on account of an employee’s death.
(C) Any lump sum payment for accumulated unused sick leave, vacation  leave or other paid
leave.
(D) Any severance payment,  accelerated payment of an employment contract for a future period
or advance against future wages.
(E) Any retirement incentive, retirement bonus or retirement gratuitous payment.
(F) Payment for a leave of absence after the date the  employer and employee have agreed that
no future services in a qualifying position will be performed.
(G) Payments for instructional  services rendered to public universities listed in ORS 352.002 or
the Oregon Health and  Science University when those services are in excess of full-time employment
subject to this chapter. A person employed under a contract  for less than 12 months is subject to
this subparagraph only for the months covered by the contract.
(H) The amount of an employee contribution to the individual account  program that is paid by
the employer and is  not deducted from the compensation of the employee, as provided under ORS
238A.335 (1) and (2)(b).
(I) Any amount in excess of $200,000 for a calendar year. If any period over which  salary is
determined is less than 12 months,  the $200,000 limitation for that period shall be multiplied by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the number of  months in the determination period and the de-
nominator of which is 12. The board shall adopt rules adjusting  this dollar limit to incorporate
cost-of-living adjustments authorized by the Internal Revenue Service.
(18) “System” means the Public Employees Retirement System.
(19) “Workers’ compensation benefits” means:
(a) Payments made under ORS chapter 656; or
(b) Payments provided in lieu of workers’ compensation benefits under ORS 656.027 (6).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 238A.125 is amended to read:
238A.125. (1)  Upon retiring at normal retirement age, a vested pension program member shall
be paid an annual pension for the life of the member as follows:
(a) For service as a police officer or firefighter, 1.8 percent of final average salary  multiplied
by the number of years of retirement credit attributable to service as a  police officer or firefighter.
(b) For service as other than  a police officer or firefighter, 1.5 percent of final average salary
multiplied by the number of  years of retirement credit attributable to service as other than a police
officer or firefighter.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS 238A.100  to 238A.250, the annual benefit payable to
a member under the pension program and under  any other tax-qualified defined benefit plan main-
tained by  the participating public employer may not exceed the applicable limitations set forth in
26 U.S.C. 415(b), as in effect on December 31,  [ 2016] 2017. The Public Employees Retirement Board
shall adopt rules for the administration of this limitation, including adjustments in the  annual dollar
limitation to reflect cost-of-living adjustments authorized by the Internal Revenue Service.
(3) The board shall make no actuarial adjustment in a member’s  pension calculated under this
section by reason of the member’s retirement after normal retirement age.
SECTION 4.  ORS 238A.150 is amended to read:
238A.150. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250, an eligible em-
ployee who leaves a qualifying position for the  purpose of performing service in the uniformed ser-
vices, and who subsequently returns to employment with a participating public employer with
reemployment rights under  federal law, is entitled to accrue retirement credit, credit toward the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 4
probationary period required by ORS 238A.100 and credit toward the vesting requirements  of ORS
238A.115 under rules adopted by the Public Employees Retirement Board  pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) The board shall adopt rules  establishing benefits and service credit for any period of service
in the uniformed services by an employee described in subsection  (1) of this section. For the purpose
of adopting rules under this subsection, the  board shall consider and take into account all federal
law relating to  benefits and service credit for any period of service in the uniformed services, in-
cluding 26 U.S.C. 414(u), as in effect on December 31, [ 2016] 2017. Benefits and service credit under
rules adopted by  the board pursuant to this subsection may not exceed benefits and service credit
required under federal law for periods of service in the uniformed services.
SECTION 5.  ORS 238A.170 is amended to read:
238A.170. (1) An  active member of the pension program who is 70-1/2 years of age or older must
retire not later than April 1 of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the  member
terminates employment with all participating public employers. An inactive member of the pension
program must retire not later  than April 1 of the calendar year following the calendar year in which
the member attains 70-1/2 years of age.
(2) Notwithstanding any other  provision of ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250, the entire interest of a
member of the pension program must be distributed over a time period  commencing no later than
the required beginning date set forth in subsection  (1) of this section, and must be distributed in a
manner that satisfies  all other minimum distribution requirements of 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and regu-
lations implementing that section, as in effect on  December 31, [ 2016] 2017. The Public Employees
Retirement Board shall adopt rules implementing those minimum distribution requirements.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 238A.230 is amended to read:
238A.230. (1) If a member  of the pension program who is vested dies before the member’s effec-
tive date of retirement, the Public Employees Retirement Board shall pay the  death benefit provided
for in this section to:
(a) The spouse of the member to the extent not  provided to a former spouse in accordance with
a judgment or order under ORS 238.465;
(b) The former spouse of the member as provided in a judgment or  order under ORS 238.465; or
(c) Any other person who is constitutionally  required to be treated in the same manner as a
spouse for the purpose of retirement benefits.
(2)(a) The death benefit to be paid under  this section shall be for the life of the spouse, former
spouse or other person who is constitutionally required to be treated  in the same manner as a
spouse, and shall be the actuarial equivalent of 50 percent of the pension  that would otherwise have
been paid to the deceased member.
(b) For the purpose of paragraph (a) of this subsection, the amount of the pension  that would
otherwise have been paid to the deceased member shall be calculated:
(A) As of the date  of death if the member dies after the earliest retirement date for the member
under ORS 238A.165; or
(B) As if the member became an inactive member on the date of death  and thereafter retired
at the earliest retirement date if the member dies  before the earliest retirement date for the member
under ORS 238A.165.
(3) The  death benefit provided under this section is first effective on the first day of the month
following the date of death of the member. The  surviving spouse, former spouse or other person
entitled to the death  benefit may elect to delay payment of the death benefit, but payment must
commence no later than December 31 of  the calendar year in which the member would have reached
70-1/2 years of age.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250, distributions of  death
benefits under the pension program must comply with  the minimum distribution requirements of 26
U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and the regulations implementing that section, as  in effect on December 31, [ 2016]
2017. The board shall adopt rules implementing those minimum distribution requirements.
SECTION 7.  ORS 238A.370 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 5
238A.370. Notwithstanding  any other provision of ORS 238A.300 to 238A.415, the annual addition
to the employee and employer accounts of a member of the individual account program for a cal-
endar year, together with  the annual additions to the accounts of the member under any other de-
fined contribution plan maintained by the participating public employer for a calendar  year, may
not exceed the lesser of $40,000, or 100  percent of the member’s compensation for that calendar
year. For purposes of this  section, “annual addition” has the meaning given that term in 26 U.S.C.
415(c)(2), as in effect on December 31,  [ 2016] 2017, and “compensation” has the meaning given the
term “participant’s compensation” in 26 U.S.C. 415(c)(3), as in effect on December 31, [ 2016] 2017.
The Public Employees Retirement Board shall adopt rules for the administration of this limitation,
including adjustments in the annual dollar limitation to reflect cost-of-living  adjustments authorized
by the Internal Revenue Service.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 238A.400 is amended to read:
238A.400. (1) Upon retirement on or after the earliest  retirement date, as described in ORS
238A.165, a member of the individual account program shall receive in a lump  sum the amounts in
the member’s employee account, rollover account  and employer account to the extent the member
is vested in those accounts under ORS 238A.320.
(2) In lieu of a lump sum payment  under subsection (1) of this section, a member of the indi-
vidual account program may elect to receive the amounts  in the member’s employee account and
employer account, to the extent the member is vested in those accounts under ORS 238A.320, in
substantially equal installments paid over a period of 5, 10, 15 or 20 years, or over a period that  is
equal to the anticipated life span of the member as actuarially determined  by the Public Employees
Retirement Board. Installments may  be made on a monthly, quarterly or annual basis. In no event
may the period selected  by the member exceed the time allowed by the minimum distribution re-
quirements described in subsection (5) of this section. The board shall by rule establish the  manner
in which installments will  be adjusted to reflect investment gains and losses on the unpaid balance
during the payout period elected by the member under this  subsection. The board by rule may es-
tablish minimum monthly amounts  payable under this subsection. The board may require that a
lump sum payment, or an  installment schedule different than the schedules provided for in this
subsection, be used to pay the vested amounts in the  member’s accounts if those amounts are not
adequate to generate the minimum monthly amounts specified by the rule.
(3) A member of the individual  account program electing to receive installments under sub-
section (2) of  this section must designate a beneficiary or beneficiaries. In the event the member dies
before all amounts in the employee  and vested employer accounts are paid, all remaining installment
payments shall be made to the beneficiary or beneficiaries designated by  the member. A beneficiary
may elect to receive a lump sum distribution of the remaining amounts.
(4) A member who  is entitled to receive retirement benefits under ORS chapter 238 may receive
vested amounts in the member’s employee  account, rollover account and employer account in the
manner provided by this section when the member retires for service under the provisions  of ORS
chapter 238.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 238A.300 to 238A.415, the entire  interest of a
member of the individual  account program must be distributed over a time period commencing no
later than the latest retirement date set forth in ORS 238A.170, and  must be distributed in a manner
that satisfies all other  minimum distribution requirements of 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and regulations im-
plementing that section, as in effect  on December 31, [ 2016] 2017. The board shall adopt rules im-
plementing those minimum distribution requirements.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 238A.410 is amended to read:
238A.410. (1) If a member of the individual account program dies before retirement, the amounts
in the member’s employee account, rollover account and employer account, to the extent the member
is vested in those accounts under ORS 238A.320, shall be paid in  a lump sum to the beneficiary or
beneficiaries designated by the member for the purposes of this section.
(2) If a member of the individual account program is married at the time of death, or there exists
at the time of death any other person who  is constitutionally required to be treated in the same
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 6
manner as a spouse for the purpose of retirement benefits, the spouse  or other person shall be the
beneficiary for purposes of  the death benefit payable under this section unless the spouse or other
person consents to the  designation of a different beneficiary or beneficiaries before the designation
has been made and the consent has not  been revoked by the spouse or other person as of the time
of the member’s death. Consent and revocation of consent must be in writing, acknowledged by a
notary public, and submitted to  the Public Employees Retirement Board in accordance with rules
adopted by the board. If the member’s spouse  is designated as the member’s beneficiary and the
marriage of the member and spouse is subsequently dissolved, the  former spouse shall be treated as
predeceasing the member for purposes of this section, unless the  member expressly designates the
former spouse as beneficiary after the effective  date of the dissolution or the former spouse is re-
quired to be designated as a beneficiary under the provisions of ORS 238.465.
(3) For purposes of this section and  ORS 238A.400 (3), if a member fails to designate a benefi-
ciary, or if the person or persons designated do not survive the member, the  death benefit provided
for in this section shall be paid to the  following person or persons, in the following order of priority:
(a) The member’s surviving spouse  or other person who is constitutionally required to be treated
in the same manner as a spouse;
(b) The member’s surviving children, in equal shares; or
(c) The member’s estate.
(4) The entire  amount of a deceased member’s vested accounts must be distributed by December
31 of the fifth calendar year  after the year in which the member died. Notwithstanding any other
provision of this chapter, distributions of death benefits under the individual  account program must
comply with the minimum distribution requirements of 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9)  and the regulations im-
plementing that section, as in effect on December  31, [ 2016] 2017. The Public Employees Retirement
Board shall adopt rules implementing those minimum distribution requirements.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 238A.415 is amended to read:
238A.415. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 238A.300 to 238A.415, an eligible em-
ployee who leaves a qualifying position for the purpose  of performing service in the uniformed ser-
vices, and who subsequently returns to employment with a participating public employer with
reemployment rights under federal law, is entitled to credit toward the  probationary period required
by ORS 238A.300, credit toward the vesting requirements of ORS 238A.320  and contributions under
rules adopted by the Public Employees Retirement Board pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The board shall adopt rules establishing contributions and service credit for any  period of
service in the uniformed  services by an employee described in subsection (1) of this section. For the
purpose of adopting rules under this subsection, the  board shall consider and take into account all
federal law relating to benefits and service credit  for any period of service in the uniformed ser-
vices,  including  26 U.S.C. 414(u), as in effect on December 31, [ 2016] 2017. Contributions and service
credit under rules adopted by the board  pursuant to this subsection may not exceed contributions
and service credit required under federal law for periods of service in the uniformed services.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 238A.430 is amended to read:
238A.430. (1) To the extent required by law, and except as otherwise provided by rules adopted
by the Public  Employees Retirement Board under subsection (4) of this section, any portion of a
distribution  of  benefits described in subsection (2) of this section shall, at the election of and in lieu
of distribution to the distributee, be paid directly to  an eligible retirement plan specified by the
distributee.
(2) The provisions of  subsection (1) of this section apply to a distribution of any benefit under
the pension program or the individual account program except:
(a) A distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal periodic payments made  at least
annually for the life or life expectancy of the distributee, or  for the joint lives or life expectancies
of the distributee and a designated beneficiary;
(b) A distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal periodic payments made  at least
annually for a specified period of 10 years or more; and
(c) A distribution to the extent that the distribution is required under 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9).
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 7
(3) The provisions of subsection (1)  of this section apply to any portion of a distribution of
benefits under the  pension program or the individual account program even though the portion
consists of after-tax employee contributions that are not includable in gross income. Any  portion of
a distribution that consists of  after-tax employee contributions that are not includable in gross in-
come may be transferred only to an individual  retirement account or annuity described in 26 U.S.C.
408(a) or (b), or to a qualified defined contribution or defined benefit  plan described in 26 U.S.C.
401(a) or 403(b) that agrees to account separately for amounts  transferred, including accounting
separately for the portion  of the distribution that is includable in gross income and the portion of
the distribution that is not includable in gross income. The amount transferred shall be treated as
consisting first of the portion of the distribution that  is includable in gross income, determined
without regard to 26 U.S.C. 402(c)(1).
(4) The board shall adopt rules implementing the direct rollover requirements of 26 U.S.C.
401(a)(31) and the regulations implementing that section, and may adopt administrative  exceptions
to the direct rollover requirements to the extent permitted by  26 U.S.C. 401(a)(31) and the regu-
lations implementing that section.
(5) All  references in this section to federal laws and regulations are to the laws and regulations
in effect on December 31, [ 2016] 2017.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Distributee” means a member, a member’s surviving spouse or  a member’s alternate payee
under ORS 238.465.
(b) “Eligible retirement plan” means:
(A) An individual retirement account described in 26 U.S.C. 408(a);
(B) An  individual retirement annuity described in 26 U.S.C. 408(b), other than an endowment
contract;
(C) A qualified trust under 26 U.S.C.  401(a), that is a defined contribution or defined benefit plan
and permits the acceptance of rollover contributions;
(D) An annuity plan described in 26 U.S.C. 403(a);
(E) An eligible deferred compensation plan described  in 26 U.S.C. 457(b) that is maintained by
an eligible governmental employer described in 26 U.S.C. 457(e)(1)(A) and that  agrees to account
separately for amounts transferred into such plan from the distributing plan; or
(F) An annuity contract described in 26 U.S.C. 403(b).
SECTION 12.
 ORS 238A.435 is amended to read:
238A.435. (1) If a benefit is payable under this chapter to a beneficiary by reason of the  death
of a member of the system, the beneficiary may elect to have all or part of the distribution of  the
death benefit paid  in an eligible rollover distribution to an individual retirement plan described in
26 U.S.C. 408(a), or an individual  retirement annuity, other than an endowment contract, described
in 26 U.S.C. 408(b), if the plan or annuity is established for the purpose of receiving  the eligible
rollover distribution on behalf of the designated beneficiary.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies to  an eligible rollover distribution of death benefits to
a beneficiary who is not treated as the spouse of the  decedent for federal tax purposes and who is
the decedent’s designated beneficiary for the purposes of  the minimum required distribution re-
quirements of 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9). To the extent provided by rules of  the Public Employees Retire-
ment Board, a trust maintained for the benefit of one  or more beneficiaries must be treated by the
board in the same manner  as a trust that is designated as a beneficiary for the purposes of the
minimum required distribution requirements of 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9).
(3) As used in this section, “eligible rollover distribution”  has the meaning given that term in
26 U.S.C. 402(c)(4), as in effect on December 31, [ 2016] 2017.
SECTION 13.  ORS 305.230 is amended to read:
305.230. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 9.320:
(a) Any person who  is qualified to practice law or public accountancy in this state, any person
who has been  granted active enrollment to practice before the Internal Revenue Service and who
is qualified to prepare tax returns in this state or any person who  is the authorized employee of a
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 8
taxpayer and is regularly  employed by the taxpayer in tax matters may represent the taxpayer be-
fore a tax court magistrate or the Department of Revenue in any conference or proceeding with
respect to the administration of any tax.
(b) Any person who is licensed by the State Board  of Tax Practitioners or who is exempt from
such licensing requirement as provided for and limited  by ORS 673.610 may represent a taxpayer
before a tax court magistrate or the department in  any conference or proceeding with respect to the
administration of any tax on or measured by net income.
(c) Any shareholder of an S corporation, as defined in section 1361 of the  Internal Revenue
Code, as amended and in effect on December 31,  [ 2016] 2017, may represent the corporation in any
proceeding before a  tax court magistrate or the department in the same manner as if the share-
holder were a partner and the S corporation were a partnership. The S corporation  must designate
in writing a tax matters shareholder authorized to represent the S corporation.
(d) An  individual who is licensed as a real estate broker or principal real estate broker under
ORS 696.022 or is a state  certified appraiser or state licensed appraiser under ORS 674.310 or is a
registered appraiser under ORS 308.010 may represent a taxpayer before  a tax court magistrate or
the department in any conference or  proceeding with respect to the administration of any ad
valorem property tax.
(e) A general partner who has been designated by members  of a partnership as their tax matters
partner under  ORS 305.242 may represent those partners in any conference or proceeding with re-
spect to the administration of any tax on or measured by net income.
(f) Any person authorized under rules adopted by the  department may represent a taxpayer be-
fore the department in any conference or proceeding with respect to any  tax. Rules adopted under
this paragraph, to the extent feasible, shall be consistent  with federal law that governs represen-
tation before the Internal Revenue Service, as  federal law is amended and in effect on December
31, [2016] 2017.
(g) Any person authorized under rules adopted  by the tax court may represent a taxpayer in a
proceeding before a tax court magistrate.
(2) A person may not be recognized as representing a taxpayer pursuant to this  section unless
there is first filed with the magistrate or department  a written authorization, or unless it appears
to the satisfaction of  the magistrate or department that the representative does in fact have au-
thority to represent the taxpayer. A person recognized as  an authorized representative under rules
or procedures adopted by  the tax court shall be considered an authorized representative by the de-
partment.
(3) A taxpayer represented by someone other than an  attorney is bound by all things done by
the authorized representative, and may not thereafter claim any proceeding was  legally defective
because the taxpayer was not represented by an attorney.
(4) Prior to the holding of  a conference or proceeding before the tax court magistrate or de-
partment, written notice shall be given by  the magistrate or department to the taxpayer of the
provisions of subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 305.494 is amended to read:
305.494. Notwithstanding ORS 9.320, any shareholder of an S corporation as defined  in section
1361 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended and in effect on December 31, [ 2016] 2017, may
represent  the  corporation in any proceeding before the Oregon Tax Court in the same manner as
if the shareholder were a partner and the S corporation were a partnership.
SECTION 15.  ORS 305.690 is amended to read:
305.690. As used in ORS 305.690 to 305.753, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Biennial years” means the  two income tax years of individual taxpayers that begin in the
two calendar years immediately following the calendar year in which a list is certified under  ORS
305.715.
(2) “Commission” means the Oregon Charitable Checkoff Commission.
(3) “Department” means the Department of Revenue.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 9
(4) “Eligibility roster” means a list, prepared under ORS 305.715 and maintained  by the com-
mission in chronological order based on the date of form listing or  date of eligibility determination,
whichever is later, of charitable and governmental entities seeking inclusion on the Oregon indi-
vidual income tax return forms.
(5) “Form listed”  or “form listing” means being listed on the Oregon individual income tax re-
turn form.
(6) “Instruction listing” means being listed  on the Department of Revenue instructions for tax
return checkoff contribution.
(7) “Internal Revenue Code” means the federal  Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect
on December 31, [ 2016] 2017.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 305.842 is amended to read:
305.842. (1) As used in ORS 307.130, 307.147, 308A.450, 310.140 and  310.800, “Internal Revenue
Code” means the  federal Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, [ 2016]
2017.
(2) As used  in ORS 311.666, “Internal Revenue Code” means the federal Internal Revenue Code
as amended and in effect on December  31, [ 2016] 2017, including amendments that take effect after
that date.
SECTION 17.  ORS 314.011 is amended to read:
314.011. (1)  As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, “department” means
the Department of Revenue.
(2) As used in this chapter:
(a) Any term has the same  meaning as when used in a comparable context in the laws of the
United States relating to federal income taxes, unless a different  meaning is clearly required or the
term is specifically defined in this chapter.
(b) Except where the Legislative Assembly has provided otherwise, a reference to the  laws of
the United States or to the Internal Revenue Code refers to  the laws of the United States or to the
Internal Revenue Code as they are amended and in effect:
(A) On December 31, [ 2016] 2017; or
(B) If related to the definition of taxable income, as applicable to the tax year of the taxpayer.
(c) With respect to  ORS 314.105, 314.256 (relating to proxy tax on lobbying expenditures),
314.260 (1)(b), 314.265 (1)(b), 314.302,  314.306, 314.330, 314.360, 314.362, 314.385, 314.402, 314.410,
314.412, 314.525, 314.742 (7), 314.750 and 314.752 and other provisions of  this chapter, except those
described in paragraph  (b) of this subsection, any reference to the laws of the United States or to
the Internal Revenue Code means the laws of the United States  relating to income taxes or the
Internal Revenue Code as they are amended on  or before December 31, [ 2016] 2017, even when the
amendments take effect or become operative  after that date, except where the Legislative Assembly
has specifically provided otherwise.
(3) Insofar as is practicable in the  administration of this chapter, the department shall apply and
follow the administrative and judicial interpretations of the federal income tax law. When a pro-
vision of  the federal income tax law is the subject of conflicting opinions by two or more federal
courts, the department shall follow the rule observed by the United States Commissioner of Internal
Revenue until the conflict is resolved. Nothing contained  in this section limits the right or duty of
the department to audit the return of any taxpayer or to determine any fact relating  to the tax li-
ability of any taxpayer.
(4) When portions of the Internal Revenue Code incorporated by  reference as provided in sub-
section (2) of this section refer to rules or regulations prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury,
then such rules or regulations shall be  regarded as rules adopted by the department under and in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, whenever they are prescribed or amended.
(5)(a) When portions of the Internal Revenue Code incorporated by reference as provided in
subsection (2) of this section are later corrected by an Act or a Title within an Act of the  United
States Congress designated  as an Act or Title making technical corrections, then notwithstanding
the date that the Act or Title becomes law, those portions of  the Internal Revenue Code, as so
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 10
corrected, shall be  the portions of the Internal Revenue Code incorporated by reference as provided
in subsection (2) of this section and shall  take effect, unless otherwise indicated by the Act or Title
(in which  case the provisions shall take effect as indicated in the Act or Title), as if originally in-
cluded in the provisions of the Act  being technically corrected. If, on account of this subsection, any
adjustment is required to an Oregon  return that would otherwise be prevented by operation of law
or rule, the adjustment shall  be made, notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, in the
manner provided under ORS 314.135.
(b) As  used in this subsection, “Act or Title” includes any subtitle, division or other part of an
Act or Title.
SECTION 18.  ORS 314.306 is amended to read:
314.306. (1) If a taxpayer excludes an amount from federal gross income by reason  of the dis-
charge of indebtedness of  the taxpayer under section 108(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code (re-
lating to discharge of indebtedness in a bankruptcy declared under U.S.C.  Title 11), then, with
respect to that portion of the excluded amount that is  apportioned to Oregon, the taxpayer shall
apply the rules in 11 U.S.C. 346(j), as amended and in effect on December 31, [ 2016] 2017.
(2) If a  taxpayer excludes an amount from federal gross income by reason of the discharge of
indebtedness of the taxpayer under section 108(a)(1)(B) or (C) of  the Internal Revenue Code (relating
to discharge of indebtedness in insolvency or discharge of qualified  farm indebtedness), then, with
respect  to  that portion of the excluded amount that is apportioned to Oregon, the following para-
graphs shall apply, in the following order:
(a) If the taxpayer has made the election under section 108(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code
to first reduce the basis of the  depreciable property of the taxpayer, the election shall also be ef-
fective for Oregon tax purposes. A corresponding reduction in the basis  of the depreciable property
of the taxpayer shall be made for Oregon tax purposes.
(b) The  amount, if any, by which the following attributes are reduced under section 108(b)(1) of
the Internal Revenue Code for federal tax purposes shall be added back for Oregon tax purposes:
(A) Federal net operating loss.
(B) Capital loss carryover.
(C) Basis of the property of  the taxpayer, excluding amounts subject to the election under sec-
tion 108(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(D) Passive activity loss carryover.
(c) Excluding amounts subject to the election in section 108(b)(5) of the  Internal Revenue Code:
(A) Any Oregon net operating loss of an individual or corporate  taxpayer, including a net op-
erating loss carryover to the taxpayer, shall be reduced by the amount of discharged indebtedness.
(B) Any net capital loss for the taxable year  of the discharge, and any capital loss carryover to
the taxable year, shall be reduced by the amount of discharged indebtedness minus the  total amount
taken into account under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) The basis of the property  of the taxpayer shall be reduced by the amount of discharged
indebtedness minus the total amount taken into account under subparagraphs (A) and (B) of  this
paragraph.
(D) The passive activity loss carryover under section 469(b) of the Internal  Revenue Code from
the taxable year of the discharge shall be reduced by the amount of discharged indebtedness minus
the total amount taken into account under subparagraphs (A), (B) and (C) of this paragraph.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 315.004 is amended to read:
315.004. (1) Except  when the context requires otherwise, the definitions contained in ORS
chapters 314, 316,  317 and 318 are applicable in the construction, interpretation and application of
the personal and corporate income and excise tax credits contained in this chapter.
(2)(a) For purposes of the tax credits contained in this chapter,  any term has the same meaning
as when used in a comparable context  in the laws of the United States relating to federal income
taxes, unless a different meaning is clearly required or the term is specifically defined for purposes
of construing, interpreting and applying the credit.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 11
(b) With respect to the tax credits contained in this chapter,  any reference to the laws of the
United States or to the Internal Revenue Code means the laws of the United  States relating to in-
come taxes or the Internal Revenue Code as  they are amended on or before December 31, [ 2016]
2017, even when the amendments take effect or become operative after that date.
(3) Insofar as is  practicable in the administration of this chapter, the Department of Revenue
shall apply and follow the administrative and judicial interpretations of the federal income  tax law.
When a provision of the federal income tax law is the subject  of conflicting opinions by two or more
federal courts, the department shall follow the rule observed by the United  States Commissioner of
Internal Revenue until the conflict is resolved. Nothing contained in this section  limits the right
or duty of the department to audit  the return of any taxpayer or to determine any fact relating to
the tax liability of any taxpayer.
(4) When portions of the Internal  Revenue Code incorporated by reference as provided in sub-
section (2) of this section refer to rules or regulations prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury,
then such rules or regulations shall be regarded as rules adopted  by the department under and in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, whenever they are prescribed or amended.
(5)(a) When portions of the Internal Revenue Code incorporated by reference as provided in
subsection  (2) of this section are later corrected by an Act or a Title within an Act of the United
States Congress designated as an Act or Title making technical corrections,  then notwithstanding
the date that the Act or Title  becomes law, those portions of the Internal Revenue Code, as so
corrected, shall be  the portions of the Internal Revenue Code incorporated by reference as provided
in subsection (2) of this section and shall  take effect, unless otherwise indicated by the Act or Title
(in which case the provisions shall take effect as indicated in the Act or Title), as if originally  in-
cluded in the provisions of the Act  being technically corrected. If, on account of this subsection, any
adjustment is required to an Oregon return that would otherwise be  prevented by operation of law
or rule, the adjustment shall be made, notwithstanding any law or rule to  the contrary, in the
manner provided under ORS 314.135.
(b) As used in this subsection, “Act or Title” includes any subtitle, division or other part of  an
Act or Title.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 316.012 is amended to read:
316.012. Any term used in this chapter has the same meaning as when used  in a comparable
context in the laws of the United States relating to federal income taxes, unless a different meaning
is clearly required or the term is  specifically defined in this chapter. Except where the Legislative
Assembly has provided otherwise, any reference in this chapter to the laws of the United States or
to the Internal Revenue Code refers to the  laws of the United States or to the Internal Revenue
Code as they are amended and in effect:
(1) On December 31, [ 2016] 2017; or
(2) If related to the definition of taxable income, as applicable to the tax year of the taxpayer.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 316.147 is amended to read:
316.147. As used in ORS 316.147 to 316.149, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Eligible taxpayer” includes any individual who must pay taxes otherwise imposed  by this
chapter and:
(a) Who pays or incurs expenses for the care of  a qualified individual, through a payment
method determined by rule of the Department of Revenue; and
(b) Who has a household income, for the taxable year, not to exceed the maximum amount of
household income allowed in ORS 310.640 (1989 Edition) for a homeowner or renter refund.
(2) “Household income” means the aggregate income of  the eligible taxpayer and the spouse of
the taxpayer who reside  in the household, that was received during a calendar year. “Household
income” includes payments received by  the eligible taxpayer or the spouse of the taxpayer under the
federal Social Security Act for the benefit of  a minor child or minor children who reside in the
household.
(3) “Income” means “adjusted gross income” as defined in the federal Internal  Revenue Code,
as amended and in effect on December  31, [ 2016] 2017, even when the amendments take effect or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 12
become operative after that date,  relating to the measurement of taxable income of individuals, es-
tates and trusts, with the following modifications:
(a) There shall be added to adjusted gross income the following  items of otherwise exempt in-
come:
(A) The gross amount of any otherwise exempt pension less return of investment, if any.
(B) Child support received by the taxpayer.
(C) Inheritances.
(D) Gifts and grants, the sum of which are in excess of $500 per year.
(E) Amounts received by a taxpayer or spouse of a taxpayer for support from a  parent who is
not a member of the taxpayer’s household.
(F) Life insurance proceeds.
(G) Accident and health insurance proceeds, except reimbursement of incurred medical expenses.
(H) Personal injury damages.
(I) Sick pay that is not included in federal adjusted gross income.
(J) Strike benefits excluded from federal gross income.
(K) Worker’s compensation, except for reimbursement of medical expense.
(L) Military pay and benefits.
(M) Veteran’s benefits.
(N) Payments received under  the federal Social Security Act that are excluded from federal
gross income.
(O) Welfare payments, except as follows:
(i) Payments for medical care, drugs and medical supplies, if the payments are  not made directly
to the welfare recipient;
(ii) In-home services authorized and approved by the Department of Human Services; and
(iii) Direct or indirect reimbursement of expenses paid or  incurred for participation in work or
training programs.
(P) Nontaxable dividends.
(Q) Nontaxable interest not included in federal adjusted gross income.
(R) Rental allowance paid to a minister that is excluded from federal gross income.
(S) Income from sources without the United States that is excluded from federal gross income.
(b) Adjusted  gross income shall be increased due to the disallowance of the following deductions:
(A) The amount of the net loss, in  excess of $1,000, from all dispositions of tangible or intangible
properties.
(B) The amount of the net loss, in excess of $1,000, from the operation of a farm or farms.
(C) The amount  of the net loss, in excess of $1,000, from all operations of a trade or business,
profession or other activity entered into for the production or collection of income.
(D) The amount of the net loss, in excess of $1,000, from tangible or intangible property  held for
the production of rents, royalties or other income.
(E) The amount of any net operating loss carryovers or carrybacks included  in federal adjusted
gross income.
(F) The amount, in excess of  $5,000, of the combined deductions or other allowances for depre-
ciation, amortization or depletion.
(G) The amount added or subtracted, as required within the context of this section, for  adjust-
ments made under ORS 316.680 (2)(d) and 316.707 to 316.737.
(c) “Income” does not include the following:
(A) Any governmental grant that must be used by the taxpayer for rehabilitation of  the home-
stead of the taxpayer.
(B) Any refund of Oregon personal income taxes that were imposed under this chapter.
(4) “Qualified individual” includes an  individual at least 60 years of age on the date that the
expenses described in subsection (1)(a) of this section are paid or incurred by the eligible  taxpayer:
(a) Whose household income does not exceed $7,500 for the  calendar year in which the taxable
year of the taxpayer begins;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 13
(b) Who is eligible  for authorized services as defined in ORS 410.410 under Oregon Project In-
dependence;
(c) Who is certified by the Department of Human Services; and
(d) Whose care or any portion thereof is not paid for under ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 316.157 is amended to read:
316.157. (1)  In the case of an eligible individual, there shall be allowed as a credit against the
taxes otherwise due under this chapter for the taxable year an amount  equal to the lesser of the tax
liability of the taxpayer or nine percent of net pension income.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Eligible individual” means any individual who is receiving pension income and who has at-
tained 62 years of age before the close of the taxable year.
(b) “Household income” means the  aggregate income of the taxpayer and the spouse of the
taxpayer who reside in the household, that was received during the taxable year  for which a credit
is claimed, except that “household income” does not include Social Security  benefits received by the
taxpayer or the spouse of the taxpayer.
(c) “Income” means  “adjusted gross income” as defined in the federal Internal Revenue Code,
as amended and in effect on December 31, [ 2016] 2017, even  when the amendments take effect or
become operative after that date, relating to the measurement of taxable  income of individuals, es-
tates and trusts, with the following modifications:
(A) There shall be added to adjusted gross income the following items of  otherwise exempt in-
come:
(i) The gross amount of any otherwise exempt pension less return of investment, if any.
(ii) Child support received by the taxpayer.
(iii) Inheritances.
(iv) Gifts and grants, the sum of which are in excess of $500 per year.
(v) Amounts received by a taxpayer or spouse of  a taxpayer for support from a parent who is
not a member of the taxpayer’s household.
(vi) Life insurance proceeds.
(vii) Accident and health insurance proceeds, except  reimbursement of incurred medical ex-
penses.
(viii) Personal injury damages.
(ix) Sick pay that is not included in federal adjusted gross income.
(x) Strike benefits excluded from federal gross income.
(xi) Worker’s compensation, except for reimbursement of medical expense.
(xii) Military pay and benefits.
(xiii) Veteran’s benefits.
(xiv) Payments received under the federal Social Security Act that are  excluded from federal
gross income.
(xv) Welfare payments, except as follows:
(I) Payments for medical care, drugs and medical supplies, if the  payments are not made directly
to the welfare recipient;
(II) In-home services authorized and approved by the Department of Human Services; and
(III) Direct or indirect reimbursement of expenses paid or incurred for participation in work or
training programs.
(xvi) Nontaxable dividends.
(xvii) Nontaxable interest not included in federal adjusted gross income.
(xviii) Rental allowance paid to a minister that is excluded from federal gross income.
(xix) Income from  sources without the United States that is excluded from federal gross income.
(B) Adjusted gross income shall be increased due to  the disallowance of the following de-
ductions:
(i) The amount of the  net loss, in excess of $1,000, from all dispositions of tangible or intangible
properties.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 14
(ii) The amount of the net loss, in excess of $1,000, from the operation of a farm or farms.
(iii) The amount of the net loss, in excess of $1,000, from all  operations of a trade or business,
profession or other activity entered into for the production or collection of income.
(iv) The amount of the net loss, in excess of $1,000, from tangible  or intangible property held for
the production of rents, royalties or other income.
(v) The amount of any net operating loss carryovers or carrybacks included in  federal adjusted
gross income.
(vi) The amount, in  excess of $5,000, of the combined deductions or other allowances for depre-
ciation, amortization or depletion.
(vii) The amount added or subtracted, as required within the context of this section, for  adjust-
ments made under ORS 316.680 (2)(d) and 316.707 to 316.737.
(C) “Income” does not include the following:
(i) Any  governmental grant that must be used by the taxpayer for rehabilitation of the home-
stead of the taxpayer.
(ii) Any refund of Oregon personal income taxes that were imposed under this chapter.
(d) “Net pension income” means:
(A) For eligible individuals filing a joint return, the lesser of the pension income of the  eligible
individuals received during the taxable year or the excess, if any, of $15,000  over the sum of the
following amounts:
(i) Any Social Security benefits received by the eligible  individual, or by the spouse of the in-
dividual, during the taxable year; and
(ii) The excess, if any, of household income over $30,000.
(B) For an eligible individual filing a return other than a joint return, the lesser  of the pension
income of the eligible individual received during the  taxable year or the excess, if any, of $7,500
over the sum of the following amounts:
(i) Any Social Security benefits received by the eligible individual during the taxable year; and
(ii) The excess, if any, of household income over $15,000.
(e) “Pension income” means income included in Oregon taxable income from:
(A) Distributions from or pursuant to an employee  pension benefit plan, as defined in section
3(2) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, which satisfies the requirements  of
section 401 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(B) Distributions from or  pursuant to a public retirement system of this state or a political
subdivision of this state, or a public  retirement system created by an Act of this state or a political
subdivision of this state, or the public retirement system of any other state or local government;
(C) Distributions from or pursuant to a  federal retirement system created by the federal gov-
ernment for any officer or employee of the United States, including any  person retired from service
in the United States Civil Service, the Armed Forces of the United States or any agency  or subdi-
vision thereof;
(D) Distributions  or withdrawals from or pursuant to an eligible deferred compensation plan
which satisfies the requirements of section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(E) Distributions or withdrawals from or  pursuant to an individual retirement account, annuity
or trust or simplified employee pension which  satisfies the requirements of section 408 of the
Internal Revenue Code; and
(F) Distributions or withdrawals from or pursuant to  an employee annuity, including custodial
accounts treated as annuities, subject to section 403 (a) or (b) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(f) “Social Security benefits” means Social Security benefits, as  defined in section 86 of the
Internal Revenue Code (Title II Social Security or tier 1 railroad retirement benefits).
(3) If a change in  the taxable year of the eligible individual occurs as described in ORS 314.085,
or if the Department of Revenue terminates the tax year of the  eligible individual under ORS
314.440, the  credit allowed by this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent
with ORS 314.085.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 15
(4) If a change in the status of  the eligible individual from resident to nonresident or from
nonresident to resident occurs, the credit allowed by this section shall be determined in a  manner
consistent with subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 23.  ORS 317.010 is amended to read:
317.010. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Centrally assessed corporation” means every corporation the property of which is assessed
by the Department of Revenue under ORS 308.505 to 308.681.
(2) “Department” means the Department of Revenue.
(3)(a) “Consolidated  federal return” means the return permitted or required to be filed by a
group of affiliated corporations under section 1501 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) “Consolidated state return” means the return required to be filed under ORS 317.710 (5).
(4) “Doing business” means any transaction or transactions in  the course of its activities con-
ducted within the state by a national banking association, or any other corporation; provided, how-
ever, that a foreign corporation whose activities in this state are confined to purchases  of personal
property, and the storage thereof incident to shipment outside  the state, shall not be deemed to be
doing business unless such  foreign corporation is an affiliate of another foreign or domestic corpo-
ration which is doing business in Oregon. Whether or not corporations  are affiliated shall be de-
termined as provided in section 1504 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(5) “Excise tax” means a tax measured by or according  to net income imposed upon national
banking associations, all other banks, and financial,  centrally assessed, mercantile, manufacturing
and business corporations for the privilege of carrying on or doing business in this state.
(6) “Financial  institution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 314.610 except that it does
not include a credit union as defined in ORS 723.006, an interstate credit union as defined  in ORS
723.001 or a federal credit union.
(7) “Internal Revenue Code,” except  where the Legislative Assembly has provided otherwise,
refers to the laws of the United  States or to the Internal Revenue Code as they are amended and
in effect:
(a) On December 31, [ 2016] 2017; or
(b) If related to the definition of taxable income, as applicable to the tax year of the taxpayer.
(8) “Oregon taxable income” means taxable income, less the  deduction allowed under ORS
317.476, except as otherwise provided with respect to insurers in subsection (11) of  this section and
ORS 317.650 to 317.665.
(9) “Oregon net loss” means taxable loss, except as otherwise provided  with respect to insurers
in subsection (11) of this section and ORS 317.650 to 317.665.
(10) “Taxable income or loss” means the taxable income or loss determined, or in the case of a
corporation for which no  federal taxable income or loss is determined, as would be determined, un-
der chapter 1,  Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code and any other laws of the United States
relating to the determination of taxable  income or loss of corporate taxpayers, with the additions,
subtractions, adjustments and  other modifications as are specifically prescribed by this chapter ex-
cept that  in determining taxable income or loss for any year, no deduction under ORS 317.476 or
317.478 and section 45b, chapter 293, Oregon Laws 1987, shall be allowed. If  the corporation is a
corporation  to  which ORS 314.280 or 314.605 to 314.675 (requiring or permitting apportionment of
income from transactions or activities carried on both within  and without the state) applies, to
derive taxable income or loss, the following shall occur:
(a) From the amount  otherwise determined under this subsection, subtract nonapportionable in-
come, or add nonapportionable loss, whichever is applicable.
(b) Multiply the amount determined under paragraph (a) of this  subsection by the Oregon ap-
portionment percentage defined under ORS 314.280, 314.650 or 314.667,  whichever is applicable. The
resulting product shall be Oregon apportioned income or loss.
(c) To the amount determined as  Oregon apportioned income or loss under paragraph (b) of this
subsection, add nonapportionable income allocable entirely to  Oregon under ORS 314.280 or 314.625
to 314.645, or subtract nonapportionable loss allocable entirely to Oregon under ORS 314.280  or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 16
314.625 to 314.645. The resulting figure  is “taxable income or loss” for those corporations carrying
on taxable transactions or activities both within and without Oregon.
(11) As used in ORS 317.122 and 317.650 to 317.665, “insurer” means any domestic, foreign or
alien insurer as defined in ORS 731.082 and any interinsurance and reciprocal  exchange and its at-
torney in fact with respect to its attorney in fact net income as a corporate  attorney in fact acting
as attorney in compliance with ORS 731.458,  731.462, 731.466 and 731.470 for the reciprocal or
interinsurance exchange. However, “insurer” does not include title insurers or health  care service
contractors operating pursuant to ORS 750.005 to 750.095.
SECTION 24.  ORS 317.097 is amended to read:
317.097. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Annual rate” means the  yearly interest rate specified on the note, and not the annual per-
centage rate, if any, disclosed to the applicant to comply with the federal Truth in Lending Act.
(b) “Finance charge” means the total of all interest,  loan fees, interest on any loan fees financed
by the lending institution, and other charges related to the cost of obtaining credit.
(c) “Lending institution” means any insured institution, as that term is  defined in ORS 706.008,
any mortgage banking company that maintains an office  in this state or any community development
corporation that is organized under the Oregon Nonprofit Corporation Law.
(d) “Manufactured dwelling park” has the meaning given that term in ORS 446.003.
(e) “Nonprofit corporation” means a corporation that is  exempt from income taxes under section
501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31,  [ 2016]
2017.
(f) “Preservation project” means  housing that was previously developed as affordable housing
with a contract for rent assistance from the United States Department  of Housing and Urban De-
velopment or the United  States Department of Agriculture and that is being acquired by a spon-
soring entity.
(g) “Qualified assignee” means any investor participating in the secondary  market for real es-
tate loans.
(h) “Qualified borrower” means any borrower that is a sponsoring entity that has  a controlling
interest in the real property that is financed by a qualified loan. A controlling interest includes, but
is not limited to, a controlling interest in the general partner of a limited partnership that owns the
real property.
(i) “Qualified loan” means:
(A) A  loan that meets the criteria stated in subsection (5) of this section or that is made to re-
finance a loan that meets the criteria described in subsection (5) of this section; or
(B) The purchase by a lending institution of bonds, as defined in ORS 286A.001, issued on  behalf
of the Housing  and Community Services Department, the proceeds of which are used to finance or
refinance a loan that meets the criteria described in subsection (5) of this section.
(j) “Sponsoring entity” means a nonprofit corporation, nonprofit  cooperative, state governmental
entity, local  unit of government as defined in ORS 466.706, housing authority or any other person,
provided that the person  has agreed to restrictive covenants imposed by a nonprofit corporation,
nonprofit cooperative, state governmental entity, local unit of government or housing authority.
(2) The Department of Revenue shall allow a credit against taxes  otherwise due under this
chapter  for  the taxable year to a lending institution that makes a qualified loan certified by the
Housing and Community Services Department as provided in subsection (7) of this section.  The
amount of the credit is equal to the difference between:
(a) The amount of finance charge charged by the lending institution during  the taxable year at
an annual rate  less than the market rate for a qualified loan that is made before January 1, 2026,
that complies with the requirements of this section; and
(b) The amount of finance charge that would have been charged during the taxable  year by the
lending institution for the qualified  loan for housing construction, development, acquisition or re-
habilitation measured at the annual  rate charged by the lending institution for nonsubsidized loans
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 17
made under like terms and conditions at the time the qualified  loan for housing construction, de-
velopment, acquisition or rehabilitation is made.
(3) The maximum amount of credit for the difference between the  amounts described in sub-
section (2)(a) and  (b) of this section may not exceed four percent of the average unpaid balance of
the qualified loan during the tax year for which the credit is claimed.
(4) Any tax credit allowed under this section that is not used by  the taxpayer in a particular
year may be  carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability for the next succeeding
tax year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax year may be  carried forward and
used in the second succeeding  tax year, and likewise, any credit not used in that second succeeding
tax year may be carried forward  and used in the third succeeding tax year, and any credit not used
in that  third succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the fourth succeeding tax year,
and any credit not used in that fourth succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the
fifth succeeding tax year, but may not be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(5) To be eligible for the tax credit  allowable under this section, a lending institution must make
a qualified  loan by either purchasing bonds, as defined in ORS 286A.001, issued on behalf of the
Housing and  Community Services Department, the proceeds of which are used to finance or refi-
nance a loan that meets the criteria stated in this subsection, or by making a loan directly to:
(a) An individual or individuals who own  a dwelling, participate in an owner-occupied commu-
nity rehabilitation program and are certified by the  local government or its designated agent as
having an income level when the loan is made of less than 80 percent of the area median income;
(b) A qualified borrower who:
(A) Uses the loan proceeds to  finance construction, development, acquisition or rehabilitation
of housing; and
(B) Provides  a written certification executed by the Housing and Community Services Depart-
ment that the:
(i) Housing  created by the loan is or will be occupied by households earning less than 80 percent
of the area median income; and
(ii) Full amount  of savings from the reduced interest rate provided by the lending institution is
or will be passed on to the tenants in the form of reduced housing payments;
(c) Subject to subsection (14) of this section, a qualified borrower who:
(A) Uses the loan proceeds to finance  construction, development, acquisition or rehabilitation
of housing consisting of a manufactured dwelling park; and
(B) Provides a written certification executed by the Housing and Community Services  Depart-
ment that the housing will continue to be operated as a manufactured dwelling park during the  pe-
riod for which the tax credit is allowed; or
(d) A qualified borrower who:
(A) Uses the loan proceeds to finance acquisition or rehabilitation of  housing consisting of a
preservation project; and
(B) Provides  a written certification executed by the Housing and Community Services Depart-
ment that the housing preserved by the loan:
(i) Is  or will be occupied by households earning less than 80 percent of the area median income;
and
(ii) Is the subject of a rent  assistance contract with the United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development or the United States Department of Agriculture  that will be maintained by
the qualified borrower.
(6) A loan made to refinance a loan that meets  the criteria stated in subsection (5) of this sec-
tion must be treated the same  as a loan that meets the criteria stated in subsection (5) of this sec-
tion.
(7) For a qualified loan  to be eligible for the tax credit allowable under this section, the Housing
and Community Services Department must execute a  written certification for the qualified loan that:
(a) Specifies the period, not to exceed 20 years, as determined by the Housing and  Community
Services Department, during which the tax credit is allowed for the qualified loan; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 18
(b) States  that the qualified loan is within the limitation imposed by subsection (8) of this sec-
tion.
(8) The Housing and Community Services Department may certify qualified loans that are eligi-
ble under subsection (5) of this section if the total credits attributable  to all qualified loans eligible
for credits under this section and then outstanding do not exceed  $25 million for any fiscal year. In
making loan certifications under subsection (7) of this section, the Housing and Community  Services
Department shall attempt to distribute the tax credits statewide,  but shall concentrate the tax
credits in those areas of the state  that are determined by the Oregon Housing Stability Council to
have the greatest need for affordable housing.
(9) The tax credit provided for in this section may be taken whether or not:
(a) The financial institution is eligible to take a federal  income tax credit under section 42 of
the Internal Revenue Code with respect to the project financed by the qualified loan; or
(b) The project receives financing from bonds, the interest on  which is exempt from federal
taxation under section 103 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(10) For a  qualified loan defined in subsection (1)(i)(B) of this section financed through the pur-
chase of bonds, the interest of which is exempt from federal taxation under section 103 of  the
Internal Revenue Code, the  amount of finance charge that would have been charged under sub-
section (2)(b) of this section is determined by reference to the finance charge that would  have been
charged if the federally tax exempt bonds had been issued and the tax credit under  this section did
not apply.
(11) A lending institution  may sell a qualified loan for which a certification has been executed
to a qualified assignee whether or not the lending institution retains servicing of the qualified  loan
so long  as a designated lending institution maintains records, annually verified by a loan servicer,
that establish the amount of tax credit earned by the taxpayer throughout each year of eligibility.
(12) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,  a lending institution that is a community de-
velopment corporation organized under the Oregon Nonprofit Corporation Law may transfer all or
part of a tax credit allowed under this section to one or more other lending institutions that  are
stockholders or members of  the community development corporation or that otherwise participate
through the  community development corporation in the making of one or more qualified loans for
which the tax credit under this section is allowed.
(13) The lending institution shall file an annual statement with the Housing and  Community
Services  Department,  specifying that it has conformed with all requirements imposed by law to
qualify for a tax credit under this section.
(14) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(h) and (j) of this section, a qualified borrower on a  loan to
finance the construction, development, acquisition or rehabilitation of a manufactured dwelling  park
under subsection (5)(c) of this section must be a nonprofit  corporation, manufactured dwelling park
nonprofit cooperative, state governmental entity, local unit of government as  defined in ORS 466.706
or housing authority.
(15) The Housing and  Community Services Department and the Department of Revenue may
adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 458.670 is amended to read:
458.670. As used in this section and ORS 458.675 to 458.700, unless the context requires other-
wise:
(1) “Account holder” means a resident of this state who:
(a) Is 12 years of age or older;
(b) Is a member of a lower income household; and
(c) Has established an individual development account with a fiduciary organization.
(2) “Fiduciary organization” means an organization selected under ORS 458.695 to  administer
state moneys directed to individual development accounts and that is:
(a) A nonprofit, fund raising organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, [ 2016] 2017; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 19
(b) A federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe that is  located, to a significant degree, within the
boundaries of this state.
(3) “Financial institution” means:
(a) An organization regulated under ORS chapters 706 to 716 or 723; or
(b) In the case of individual  development accounts established for the purpose described in ORS
458.685 (1)(c), a financial institution as defined in ORS 178.300.
(4) “Individual development account” means a contract between an account holder and a
fiduciary organization, for the deposit of  funds into a financial institution by the account holder, and
the deposit of  matching funds into the financial institution by the fiduciary organization, to allow
the account holder  to accumulate assets for use toward achieving a specific purpose approved by
the fiduciary organization.
(5) “Lower income  household” means a household having an income equal to or less than the
greater of the following:
(a) 80 percent of the median household income for the area as determined by the Housing and
Community Services Department. In making the determination, the department shall give  consider-
ation to any data on area household income published by the United States Department of  Housing
and Urban Development.
(b) 200 percent of the poverty guidelines as determined by the Housing and Community Services
Department. In making the determination,  the department shall give consideration to poverty
guidelines published by the United States Department of Health and  Human Services and may con-
sider other income data periodically published by other federal or Oregon agencies.
(6) “Resident of this state” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.027.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 657.010 is amended to read:
657.010. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Base year” means the first four of the last  five completed calendar quarters preceding the
benefit year.
(2) “Benefits” means the money allowances payable to unemployed persons under this chapter.
(3) “Benefit year”  means a period of 52 consecutive weeks commencing with the first week with
respect to which an  individual files an initial valid claim for benefits, and thereafter the 52 con-
secutive weeks period beginning with  the first week with respect to which the individual next files
an initial valid claim after the termination of the individual’s last  preceding benefit year except that
the benefit year shall be 53 weeks if the filing of an  initial valid claim would result in overlapping
any quarter of the base year of a previously filed initial valid claim.
(4) “Calendar  quarter” means the period of three consecutive calendar months ending on March
31, June 30, September 30  or December 31, or the approximate equivalent thereof, as the Director
of the Employment Department may, by regulation, prescribe.
(5) “Contribution” or “contributions” means the taxes, as defined  in subsection (13) of this sec-
tion, that are the money payments required by this chapter,  or voluntary payments permitted, to be
made to the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund.
(6) “Educational  institution,” including an institution of higher education as defined in sub-
section (9) of this section, means an institution:
(a) In which participants, trainees  or students are offered an organized course of study or
training designed to transfer to them knowledge, skills, information, doctrines, attitudes or abilities
from, by or under the guidance of an instructor or teacher;
(b) That  is accredited, registered, approved, licensed or issued a permit to operate as a school
by the Department of Education or other government agency,  or that offers courses for credit that
are transferable to an approved, registered or accredited school;
(c) In which the course or courses of study or training  that it offers may be academic, technical,
trade or preparation for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; and
(d) In  which the course or courses of study or training are offered on a regular and continuing
basis.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 20
(7) “Employment office” means a free public employment  office or branch thereof, operated by
this state or maintained as a part of a state-controlled system of public employment offices.
(8) “Hospital” means an organization that has been licensed, certified or approved by  the
Oregon Health Authority as a hospital.
(9) “Institution of higher education” means an educational institution that:
(a) Admits  as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation from a high
school, or the recognized equivalent of such a certificate;
(b) Is legally authorized in this state to provide a program of education beyond high school;
(c) Provides an educational program for which it awards  a bachelor’s or higher degree, or pro-
vides a program that is acceptable for full credit toward such a degree, a program of  post-graduate
or post-doctoral studies, or a program of  training to prepare students for gainful employment in a
recognized occupation; and
(d) Is a public or other nonprofit institution.
(10) “Internal Revenue Code” means the federal Internal Revenue Code, as amended and in ef-
fect on December 31, [ 2016] 2017.
(11) “Nonprofit  employing unit” means an organization, or group of organizations, described in
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue  Code that is exempt from income tax under section 501(a)
of the Internal Revenue Code.
(12) “State” includes, in addition to the states of the United States of America, the District  of
Columbia and Puerto Rico. However, for  all purposes of this chapter the Virgin Islands shall be
considered a state on and after the day on which the United States Secretary of Labor first approves
the Virgin Islands’ law under section 3304(a) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by
Public Law 94-566.
(13) “Taxes” means the  money payments to the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund re-
quired, or voluntary payments permitted, by this chapter.
(14) “Valid claim” means any claim for benefits made in accordance with ORS 657.260 if the
individual meets the wages-paid-for-employment requirements of ORS 657.150.
(15) “Week” means any period of seven consecutive  calendar days ending at midnight, as the
director may, by regulation, prescribe. The director may by regulation prescribe that  a “week” shall
be “in,” “within,” or “during” the calendar quarter that includes the greater part of such week.
SECTION 27.
(1) Except as provided  in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
amendments to statutes by sections 1 to 26 of this 2018  Act apply to transactions or activ-
ities occurring on or  after January 1, 2018, in tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2018.
(2) The effective and applicable dates, and the  exceptions, special rules and coordination
with the Internal Revenue Code, as amended,  relative to those dates, contained in the Dis-
aster Tax Relief and Airport and Airway Extension Act of 2017 (P.L. 115-63), and An Act  to
Provide for Reconciliation Pursuant to Titles II and V of the Concurrent Resolution  on the
Budget for Fiscal Year 2018 (P.L. 115-97) and other federal law amending the Internal Re-
venue Code and enacted before January 1, 2018,  apply for Oregon personal income and cor-
porate excise and income tax purposes, to  the extent they can be made applicable, in the
same manner as they are applied under the Internal Revenue Code and related federal law.
(3)(a) If a deficiency is assessed against any taxpayer for a tax year beginning before
January 1, 2018, and the deficiency or any portion thereof is attributable to  any retroactive
treatment under the amendments to ORS 178.300, 305.230,  305.494, 305.690, 305.842, 314.011,
314.306, 315.004, 316.012, 316.147, 316.157, 317.010 and 317.097 by sections 1 and 13 to 24 of this
2018 Act, then any  interest or penalty assessed under ORS chapter 305, 314, 315, 316, 317 or
318 with respect to the deficiency or portion thereof shall be canceled.
(b) If a  refund is due any taxpayer for a tax year beginning before January 1, 2018, and
the refund or any portion thereof is due the taxpayer on account of any retroactive treat-
ment under the amendments to ORS 178.300, 305.230, 305.494, 305.690, 305.842, 314.011,  314.306,
315.004, 316.012, 316.147, 316.157, 317.010 and 317.097 by sections 1 and 13 to 24 of this 2018 Act,
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 21
for a tax year beginning before January 1, 2018, then notwithstanding  ORS 305.270 or 314.415
or any other law, the refund or portion thereof shall be paid without interest.
(c) Any changes required because of the amendments to ORS 178.300, 305.230, 305.494,
305.690, 305.842, 314.011, 314.306, 315.004, 316.012, 316.147,  316.157, 317.010 and 317.097 by
sections 1 and 13 to 24 of this 2018 Act, for a tax year beginning before January 1, 2018, shall
be made by filing an amended return within the time prescribed by law.
(d) If a  taxpayer fails to file an amended return under paragraph (c) of this subsection,
the Department of Revenue shall make any changes under  paragraph (c) of this subsection
on the return to which  the changes relate within the period specified for issuing a notice of
deficiency or claiming a refund as otherwise provided by law with respect to that  return, or
within one year after a return for a tax year beginning  on or after January 1, 2018, and be-
fore January 1, 2019, is filed, whichever period expires later.
SECTION 28.  ORS 317.267 is amended to read:
317.267. (1) To  derive Oregon taxable income, there shall be added to federal taxable income
amounts received as dividends from corporations deducted for  federal purposes pursuant to section
243 or 245 of the Internal Revenue Code, except section 245(c) of the Internal Revenue Code,
amounts deducted for income repatriated, deemed or otherwise, under An Act to Provide for
Reconciliation Pursuant to Titles II and V of the Concurrent Resolution  on the Budget for
Fiscal Year 2018 (P.L. 115-97),  amounts paid as dividends  by a public utility or telecommunications
utility and deducted for federal purposes pursuant to section  247 of the Internal Revenue Code or
dividends eliminated under Treasury Regulations  adopted under section 1502 of the Internal Re-
venue Code that are paid by members of  an affiliated group that are eliminated from a consolidated
federal return pursuant to ORS 317.715 (2).
(2) To derive Oregon taxable income,  after the modification prescribed under subsection (1) of
this section, there shall be subtracted from federal taxable income  an amount equal to 70 percent
of dividends (determined without regard to section 78 of the Internal Revenue  Code) received or
deemed received from corporations if such dividends are included in federal  taxable income. How-
ever:
(a) In the case of any dividend on debt-financed  portfolio stock as described in section 246A of
the Internal Revenue Code,  the subtraction allowed under this subsection shall be reduced under the
same conditions and in same amount as the dividends  received deduction otherwise allowable for
federal income tax purposes is reduced under section 246A of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) In the case of any dividend received from  a 20 percent owned corporation, as defined in
section 243(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, this subsection shall  be applied by substituting “80
percent” for “70 percent.”
(c) A dividend that is not treated as a dividend under section 243(d) or 965(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code may not be treated as a dividend for purposes of this subsection.
(d) If a dividends received deduction is  not allowed for federal tax purposes because of section
246(a) or (c) of the  Internal Revenue Code, a subtraction may not be made under this subsection for
received dividends that are described in section 246(a) or (c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(e) In the case of any dividend received from an alien,  domestic or foreign insurer, as defined
in ORS  731.082, that would be included in the taxpayer’s consolidated Oregon return but for the
application of ORS 317.710 (5) or (7), this subsection shall be  applied by substituting “100 percent”
for “70 percent.”
(3) There shall be excluded from the sales factor of any apportionment  formula employed to at-
tribute income to this state any amount subtracted from federal taxable income under subsection  (2)
of this section.
SECTION 29.
The amendments to ORS 317.267 by section 28 of this 2018 Act  apply to tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2017.
SECTION 30. Section 31 of  this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 31. On or before July 1, 2021, the Department of Revenue shall:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 22
(1) Estimate the increase, if any,  of corporate tax revenue received by the department
and attributable to the treatment  of post-1986 deferred foreign income under An Act to
Provide for Reconciliation  Pursuant to Titles II and V of the Concurrent Resolution on the
Budget for Fiscal Year 2018 (P.L. 115-97); and
(2) Notwithstanding ORS  317.853, distribute an amount equal to the estimate required
under subsection (1) of this section as follows:
(a) 18 percent shall be transferred  to the Employer Incentive Fund established under
section 31a of this 2018 Act.
(b) 82 percent shall be transferred to the School Districts Unfunded Liability Fund es-
tablished under section 31b of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 31a. (1) The  Employer Incentive Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Employer Incentive
Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the Public Employees Retire-
ment Board for  the purpose of incentivizing participating public employers, as defined in ORS
238.005, to make lump sum prepayments of employer contributions.
SECTION 31b. (1) The School Districts Unfunded Liability Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the School Dis-
tricts Unfunded Liability Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the Public Employees Retire-
ment Board for the purpose of applying the  moneys against the liabilities of participating
public employers, as defined in ORS 238.005, that are school districts.
SECTION 32. Section 33 of  this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 33. (1) A credit against the taxes otherwise  due under ORS chapter 317 or 318
shall be allowed to a taxpayer for Oregon  tax attributable to income reported under section
965 of the Internal Revenue Code as post-1986 deferred foreign income.
(2) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the lesser of:
(a) The amount of  Oregon tax attributable to income reported under section 965 of the
Internal Revenue Code as post-1986 deferred foreign income for tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2018; or
(b) The total amount of tax, if any, attributable  to the addition required under ORS
317.716 and imposed for all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2014,  and before Jan-
uary 1, 2017.
(3) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the  tax liability of the taxpayer
for the tax year.
(4) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is  not used by the taxpayer
in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s  tax liability
for the next succeeding tax year.  Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax
year may be carried forward and used  in the second succeeding tax year. Any credit re-
maining unused in the  second succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the
third succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in the  third succeeding tax year may
be carried forward and used in the fourth succeeding tax  year. Any credit remaining unused
in the fourth  succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the fifth succeeding
tax year, but may not be used in any tax year thereafter.
SECTION 34.
Except as provided in section 33 (4) of this 2018 Act, section 33  of this 2018
Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2018.
SECTION 35. ORS 317.716 and 317.717 are repealed.
SECTION 36. The repeal of ORS 317.716 and 317.717 by section 35 of this 2018  Act applies
to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017.
SECTION 37. On or before December 1, 2020, the Department of Revenue  shall report in
the manner required by ORS 192.245 to a committee  of the Legislative Assembly related to
revenue regarding the relative efficacy of the provisions  of ORS 317.716, in comparison to the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 23
provisions of section 951A of the Internal Revenue Code, requiring  shareholders of controlled
foreign corporations to include global intangible low-taxed income in gross income.
SECTION 38. This 2018 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2018
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate February 13, 2018
Repassed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 2, 2018
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-B) Page 24